Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-120
Certified public accountant; reexamination
fee.

The board shall charge fees as established by the board
for reexaminations under the Public
Accountancy Act. Such fees shall not exceed fifty dollars for
each subject in which a person is reexamined. An applicant for the reexamination
may be required to pay additional fees as charged by and remitted or paid
to a third party for administering the reexamination, if required by the board.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 15, p. 60;

Laws 1976, LB 619, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 278, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 17;

Laws 2003, LB 214, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 10.